Utah statutes.
73-4-12.   Judgment -- In absence of contest.
If no contest on the part of any claimant shall have been filed, the court
shall render a judgment in accordance with such proposed determination, which
shall determine and establish the rights of the several claimants to the use
of the water of said river system or water source; and among other things it
shall set forth the name and post-office address of the person entitled to the
use of the water; the quantity of water in acre-feet or the flow of water in
second-feet; the time during which the water is to be used each year; the name
of the stream or other source from which the water is diverted; the point on
the stream or other source where the water is diverted; the priority date of
the right; and such other matters as will fully and completely define the
rights of said claimants to the use of the water.
